Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_Germinated_Constant3.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascGerminatedCon3stem;

LEXICON NounMascGerminatedCon3stem 

අඟුටු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
අමුතු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ඇති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ඉබි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
කප්පිති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
කැරපොතු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
කිනිතුලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
කූඩැලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
කෙළතොලු NounMascGerminatedCon3; 
කොලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ගරිලි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ගැති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ගුලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ගෙඹි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ගොළුබෙලි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ගෝරිලි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ගෝණුසු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
දන්න NounMascGerminatedCon3;
දිළිඳු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
දෙනා NounMascGerminatedCon3;
නමැති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
නැති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
නැමති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
නිලමැසි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
නුවණැති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
පැවිදි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බඩගැති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බයගුලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බිංකුඩු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බියගුලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බිලි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බූවලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බෙලි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බේබදු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
බෝනිකි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
මහලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
මැසි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
යමපලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
යුතු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
රටවැසි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
ලොකු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
වසු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
වැඩිමහලු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
වැදි NounMascGerminatedCon3;
සිඟිති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
සුදු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
සුදුසු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
සෙසු NounMascGerminatedCon3;
හිතැති NounMascGerminatedCon3;
කේලම NounMascGerminatedCon3;


LEXICON NounMascGerminatedCon3

+N+RT: #;

ි+N+RT+PL+VOC:නි #;
